District of Columbia statutes.
47-408

Powers of Mayor — Omission from records of uncollectible taxes and assessments.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized to direct the Collector of Taxes of the District of Columbia to omit from his records as assets of the District of Columbia any and all taxes, real and personal, and all special assessments which the Mayor may determine are uncollectible, but such determination on the part of the Mayor or the failure of the Collector to carry such taxes on his records as assets shall not affect the liability of the taxpayer for the payment of said taxes.

June 25, 1938, 52 Stat. 1202, ch. 702, § 10
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Office of Collector of Taxes abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-401.
1973 Ed., § 47-308.
1981 Ed., § 47-408.